Wisconsin, session 2025, AB739.
do enact as follows:AB739,11Section 1. 20.932 of the statutes is created to read:AB739,2,3220.932 Prohibitions concerning assistance with federal immigration 3enforcement.AB739,2,44(1) Definitions. In this section:AB739,2,85(a) “Local governmental unit” means a political subdivision, a special purpose 6district, an agency or corporation of a political subdivision or special purpose 7district, a school district, or a combination or subunit of any of the foregoing in this 8state.AB739,2,119(b) “State agency” means an association, authority, board, department, 10commission, independent agency, institution, office, society, or other body in state 11government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law.AB739,2,1612(2) Assistance by state and local officials. (a) No official, employee, or 13agent of a state agency or local governmental unit, including any law enforcement 14officer, may aid in the detention of an individual if the individual is being detained 15on the sole basis that the individual is or is alleged to be not lawfully present in the 16United States.AB739,2,1917(b) Paragraph (a) does not prohibit an official, employee, or agent of a state 18agency or local governmental unit from providing access to any place or facility as 19required pursuant to a properly executed judicial warrant.AB739,3,220(3) Federal immigration enforcement agreements. No state agency or 21local governmental unit, including any law enforcement agency, may enter into an 1agreement, or continue an existing agreement, with the federal government under 28 USC 1357 (g).AB739,3,33